Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-524
Department of Health and Human Services; duty to cooperate with other welfare agencies.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall cooperate with medical, health, nursing, and welfare groups and organizations and with any agency in the state charged with providing for local rehabilitation of physically handicapped children.

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 30, § 24, p. 188;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 43-524;

R.S.1943, § 43-524;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 171;

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 120.